ko: 전자기기 > 네트워킹 > 허브/스위치: 이더넷 허브; 기가비트 스위치; 레이어 2 스위치; 레이어 3 스위치; 관리형 스위치; 미디어 컨버터; 모듈식 스위치; PoE(Power Over Ethernet) 스위치; 스마트 스위치; 스택형 스위치; 비관리형 스위치
it: Elettronica > Rete > Hub e switch: Hub Ethernet; Interruttore Gigabit; Interruttori di livello 2; Interruttori di livello 3; Interruttori gestiti; Convertitori di media; Interruttori modulari; Interruttori Power Over Ethernet; Interruttori smart; Interruttori impilabili; Interruttori non gestiti
da: Elektronik > Netværk > Hubs og switches: Ethernet-hubs; Gigabit-switches; Layer 2-switches; Layer 3-switches; Administrerede switches; Mediekonvertere; Modulære switches; Power Over Ethernet-switches; Smart-switches; Stabelbare switches; Ikke-administrerede switches
sk-SK: Elektronika > Siete > Rozbočovače a prepínače: Ethernet huby; Gigabitové prepínače; Prepínače vrstvy 2; Prepínače vrstvy 3; Riadené prepínače; Mediálne konvertory; Modulárne prepínače; Ethernetové prepínače napájania; Inteligentné prepínače; Stohovateľné spínače; Neriadené prepínače
fi: Elektroniikka > Verkkojen toteutus > Hubit ja kytkimet: Ethernet-keskitin; Gigabit-kytkimet; Layer 2 -kytkimet; Layer 3 -kytkimet; Hallitut kytkimet; Mediamuunnin; Modulaariset kytkimet; Virta Ethernetin kautta -kytkimet; Älykytkimet; Pinottavat kytkimet; Hallitsemattomat kytkimet
en: Electronics > Networking > Hubs & Switches: Ethernet Hubs; Gigabit Switches; Layer 2 Switches; Layer 3 Switches; Managed Switches; Media Converters; Modular Switches; Power Over Ethernet Switches; Smart Switches; Stackable Switches; Unmanaged Switches
bg-BG: Електроника > Мрежово оборудване > Хъбове и комутатори: Ethernet хъбове; Гигабитови комутатори; Комутатори Layer 2; Комутатори Layer 3; Управляеми комутатори; Медия конвертори; Модулни комутатори; Ethernet захранващи комутатори; Смарткомутатори; Съединени комутатори; Неуправляеми комутатори
lt-LT: Elektronika > Tinklai > Šakotuvai ir jungikliai: Eterneto šakotuvai; Gigabitiniai jungikliai; 2 lygmens jungikliai; 3 lygmens jungikliai; Valdomi jungikliai; Laikmenos keitliai; Moduliniai jungikliai; Maitinimo eternetu jungikliai; Išmanieji jungikliai; Sujungiami jungikliai; Nevaldomi jungikliai
sv: Elektronik > Nätverk > Hubbar och switchrar: Ethernet-hubbar; Gigabit-switchar; Layer 2-switchar; Layer 3-switchar; Hanterade switchar; Mediaomvandlare; Modulära switchar; Power Over Ethernet-switchar; Smarta switchar; Stapelbara switchar; Icke-hanterade switchar
fr: Appareil électronique > Réseaux > Hubs et commutateurs: Hubs Ethernet; Commutateurs Gigabit; Commutateurs de couche 2; Commutateurs de couche 3; Commutateurs gérés; Convertisseurs de média; Commutateurs modulaires; Commutateurs PoE; Commutateurs intelligents; Commutateurs empilables; Commutateurs non gérés
hr-HR: Elektronika > Umrežavanje > Čvorišta i sklopke: Čvorište za ethernet; Gigabitne sklopke; Sklopke s 2 sloja; Sklopke s 3 sloja; Prekidači za upravljanje; Konverteri medija; Modularni prekidači; Power Over Ethernet prekidači; Pametni prekidači; Složivi prekidači; Neupravljivi prekidači
cs: Elektronika > Sítě > Rozbočovače a přepínače: Ethernetové huby; Gigabitové přepínače; Přepínače vrstvy 2; Přepínače vrstvy 3; Spravované přepínače; Mediální převodníky; Modulární přepínače; Přepínače PoE (Power over Ethernet); Chytré přepínače; Stohovatelné přepínače; Nespravované přepínače
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > ระบบเครือข่าย > ฮับและสวิตช์: ฮับ Ethernet; สวิตช์กิกะบิต; สวิตช์เลเยอร์ 2; สวิตช์เลเยอร์ 3; สวิตช์ที่กำหนดการใช้งานได้; ตัวแปลงสัญญาณสื่อ; สวิตช์แบบโมดูลาร์; สวิตช์จ่ายไฟผ่านอีเธอร์เน็ต (POE); สวิตช์อัจฉริยะ; สวิตช์แบบซ้อนกันได้; สวิตช์ที่ไม่มีการจัดการเพิ่มเติม
es: Electrónica > Redes > Concentradores y conmutadores: Hubs Ethernet; Conmutadores Gigabit; Conmutadores de capa 2; Conmutadores de capa 3; Conmutadores administrados; Convertidores de medios; Interruptores modulares; Conmutadores de alimentación a través de Ethernet; Interruptores inteligentes; Interruptores apilables; Interruptores no administrados
ja: 電子機器 > ネットワーク > ハブ・スイッチ: イーサネットハブ; ギガビットスイッチ; レイヤ2スイッチ; レイヤ3スイッチ; マネージドスイッチ; メディアコンバーター; モジュラースイッチ; パワーオーバーイーサネットスイッチ; スマートスイッチ; スタッカブルスイッチ; アンマネージドスイッチ
de: Elektronik > Netzwerktechnik > Hubs & Schalter: Ethernet-Hubs; Gigabit-Schalter; Layer-2-Switches; Layer-3-Switches; Verwaltete Schalter; Medienkonverter; Modulare Schalter; Power-Over-Ethernet-Schalter; Intelligente Schalter; Stapelbare Schalter; Nicht verwaltete Switches
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Ligação em rede > Cubos e interruptores: Hubs ethernet; Interruptores Gigabit; Interruptores de camada 2; Interruptores de camada 3; Interruptores geridos; Conversores de média; Interruptores modulares; Interruptores de alimentação via Ethernet POE; Interruptores inteligentes; Interruptores empilháveis; Interruptores não geridos
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 网络 > 集线器与交换器: 以太网集线器; 千兆交换机; 二层交换机; 三层交换机; 管理型交换机; 介质转换器; 模块化交换机; 以太网供电交换机; 智能交换机; 堆叠式交换机; 非管理型交换机
sl-SI: Elektronika > Mreženje > Vozlišča in stikala: Ethernet vozlišča; Stikala z gigabitnimi hitrostmi; Stikala plasti 2; Stikala plasti 3; Upravljana stikala; Medijski pretvorniki; Modularna stikala; Stikala za napajanje prek etherneta; Pametna stikala; Sklopna stikala; Neupravljana stikala
hu: Elektronika > Hálózatépítés > Hubok és kapcsolók: Ethernet-hubok; Gigabites kapcsolók; 2. rétegű kapcsolók; 3. rétegű kapcsolók; Felügyelt kapcsolók; Médiaátalakítók; Moduláris kapcsolók; Power Over Ethernet kapcsolók; Intelligens kapcsolók; Egymásra rakható kapcsolók; Nem felügyelt kapcsolók
nl: Elektronica > Netwerken > Hubs en switches: Ethernethubs; Gigabitswitches; Layer 2-switches; Layer 3-switches; Managed switches; Mediaconverters; Modular switches; Power-over-ethernetswitches; Slimme switches; Stackable switches; Unmanaged switches
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Nối mạng > Thiết bị kết nối trung tâm và chia cổng mạng: Trung tâm Ethernet; Thiết bị chuyển mạch Gigabit; Thiết bị chuyển mạch lớp 2; Thiết bị chuyển mạch lớp 3; Thiết bị chuyển mạch được quản lý; Bộ chuyển đổi phương tiện; Thiết bị chuyển mạch mô-đun; Thiết bị chuyển mạch Power Over Ethernet; Thiết bị chuyển mạch thông minh; Thiết bị chuyển mạch có thể xếp chồng; Thiết bị chuyển mạch không được quản lý
ru: Электроника > Сетевое оборудование > Коммутаторы: Ethernet-концентраторы; Коммутаторы Gigabit Ethernet; Коммутаторы второго уровня (L2); Коммутаторы третьего уровня (L3); Управляемые коммутаторы; Медиаконвертеры; Модульные коммутаторы; Коммутаторы PoE; Смарт-коммутаторы; Стековые коммутаторы; Неуправляемые коммутаторы
nb: Elektronikk > Nettverk > Huber og switcher: Ethernet-huber; Gigabit-svitsjer; Layer 2-svitsjer; Layer 3-svitsjer; Administrerte svitsjer; Mediekonvertere; Modulære svitsjer; Power over Ethernet-svitsjer; Smartsvitsjer; Stablbare svitsjer; Ikke-administrerte svitsjer
pl: Elektronika > Sieci > Huby i switche: Huby Ethernet; Przełączniki gigabitowe; Przełączniki warstwy 2; Przełączniki warstwy 3; Zarządzane przełączniki; Konwertery mediów; Przełączniki modułowe; Przełączniki PoE; Inteligentne przełączniki; Przełączniki piętrowe; Przełączniki niezarządzane
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Δικτύωση > Κόμβοι & διακόπτες: Πλήμνες Ethernet; Διακόπτες Gigabit; Διακόπτες επιπέδου 2; Διακόπτες επιπέδου 3; Διαχειριζόμενοι διακόπτες; Μετατροπείς πολυμέσων; Αρθρωτοί διακόπτες; Διακόπτες τροφοδοσίας μέσω Ethernet (PoE); Έξυπνοι διακόπτες; Στοιβαζόμενοι διακόπτες; Μη διαχειριζόμενοι διακόπτες
ro-RO: Electronice > Rețele > Hub-uri și comutatoare: Huburi Ethernet; Comutatoare Gigabit; Comutatoare de nivel 2; Comutatoare de nivel 3; Comutatoare gestionate; Convertoare media; Comutatoare modulare; Comutatoare Power Over Ethernet; Comutatoare inteligente; Comutatoare superpozabile; Comutatoare negestionate
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 網路 > 集線器和交換器: 乙太網集線器; Gigabit 交換器; 第二層交換機; 第三層交換器; 網管型交換器; 媒介轉換器; 模組化交換器; 乙太網電力交換器; 智慧型交換器; 可堆疊交換器; 非網管型交換器
tr: Elektronik > Ağ Sistemleri > Hublar ve Anahtarlar: Ethernet Hub'ları; Gigabit Anahtarlar; Katman 2 Anahtarları; Katman 3 Anahtarları; Yönetilen Anahtarlar; Medya Dönüştürücüleri; Modüler Anahtarlar; Ethernet Üzerinden Güç Anahtarları; Akıllı Anahtarlar; İstiflenebilir Anahtarlar; Yönetilmeyen Anahtarlar
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Rede > Hubs e interruptores: Hubs Ethernet; Switches Gigabit; Switches de camada 2; Switches de camada 3; Switches gerenciados; Conversores de mídia; Switches modulares; Switches Power Over Ethernet; Switches inteligentes; Switches empilháveis; Switches não gerenciados